Maryland, session 2025, SB0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–305.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MINORITY STUDENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT.
(3) “YOUTH SOCCER NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0408*

SENATE BILL 408
(I) PROVIDES SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES FOR CHILDREN UNDER
THE AGE OF 18 YEARS; AND
(II) IS RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES SOCCER
FEDERATION AS A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND STATE YOUTH SOCCER
ASSOCIATION.
(B) (1) THERE IS A SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM IS TO
INCREASE OPPORTUNITIES FOR MINORITY STUDENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN SOCCER
IN THEIR COMMUNITIES.
(C) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL DEVELOP AND ADMINISTER THE
SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM.
(D) (1) A YOUTH SOCCER NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION MAY SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT FOR A PROGRAM THAT IS:
(I) IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PURPOSE OF THE SOCCER
OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM; AND
(II) 1. COMPOSED OF AT LEAST 50% MINORITY PLAYERS; OR
2. COMPOSED OF AT LEAST 50% PLAYERS WHO QUALIFY
TO RECEIVE FREE LUNCH UNDER THE NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE SCOPE AND PURPOSE OF THE
PROGRAM;
(II) A BUSINESS PLAN THAT INCLUDES THE ESTIMATED TOTAL
COST OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(E) IN AWARDING A GRANT UNDER THE SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES
PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:

SENATE BILL 408 3
(1) REQUIRE THE GRANTEE TO PROVIDE MATCHING FUNDS FROM
ANY COMBINATION OF FEDERAL, COUNTY, MUNICIPAL, OR PRIVATE SOURCES; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT THE GRANT DOES NOT EXCEED 50% OF THE TOTAL
ANNUAL COST OF THE GRANTEE’S PROGRAM.
(F) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OR THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT’S
DESIGNEE SHALL:
(1) REVIEW GRANT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) TO THE EXTENT FUNDS ARE AVAILABLE, PROVIDE GRANTS TO
YOUTH SOCCER NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
A GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027, 2028, AND 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $100,000
FOR THE SOCCER OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM.
(H) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.